Illinois, session 104th, HB5537.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.8    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 9required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 10equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 11defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 12greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 13or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 14exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 15obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 16regulations.17    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 18required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 19equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 20defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 21otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 22regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 23relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply   HB5537- 2 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1with other applicable rules or regulations.2    (c) (Blank). 3    (d) (Blank).4    (e) (Blank). 5    (f) As used in this Section:6    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 7output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 8Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 9Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 10    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 11sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 12calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 13greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 14by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 15CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 16them all together.17    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 18system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 19electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 20source.21    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 22have been identified by the United States Environmental 23Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.24    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 25fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 26cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate   HB5537- 3 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 2sale.3    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 4that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 5and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 6program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.7    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 8community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 9would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 10designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 11economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 12following areas:13        (1) areas where residents have been historically 14    excluded from economic opportunities, including 15    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 16    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 17    Tax Act; and18        (2) areas where residents have been historically 19    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 20    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 21    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 22    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 23    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.24    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 25means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 26investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and   HB5537- 4 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 2person means the following people:3        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 4    investment eligible community;5        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 6    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 7    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 8    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 9    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 10    the last 5 years;11        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 12    in the foster care system; or13        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.14    "Existing emissions" means: 15        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 16    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 17    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 18    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 19    that unit's operation; and20        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 21    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 22    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 23    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 24    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 25    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 26an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic   HB5537- 5 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 2copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 3electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 4energy source.5    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 6GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 7unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 8nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 9capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 10including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 11oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.12    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 13emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 14Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 15Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 16recent year for which data is available.17    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 18GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 19including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 20by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 21municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 22other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 23and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.24    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 25output emission rate" as measured by the United States 26Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation   HB5537- 6 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 2most recent year for which data is available.3    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 4use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 5shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 6zero no later than January 1, 2030.7    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 8use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 9permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 10December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 11also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 12emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 13reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 14the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 15its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 162038.17    (i) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 18units that use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting 19units shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant 20emissions to zero, including through unit retirement or the 21use of 100% green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 22commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, 23according to the following:24        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 25    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 26    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of   HB5537- 7 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 2    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 3    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 4    community.5        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 6    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 7    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 8    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 9    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 10    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 11    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 12    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 13    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 14    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 15    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and 16    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 17    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 18    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.19        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 20    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 21    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 22    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 23    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 24    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 25    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 26    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible   HB5537- 8 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 2    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 3    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 4    2030.5        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 6    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 7    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 8    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 9    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 10    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.11        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 12    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 13    (j) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 14units that use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units 15shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 16zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 17green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 18commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 19January 1, 2045.20    (k) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 21units that utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration 22technology shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant 23emissions to zero, including through unit retirement or the 24use of 100% green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 25commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 26January 1, 2045.  HB5537- 9 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1    (k-5) (Blank). No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting 2unit that uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting 3unit may emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in 4excess of that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 5    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) and (h) through (k-5), 6large GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily 7continue emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable 8deadline specified in any of subsections (g) and (h) through 9(k-5) if it has been determined, as described in paragraphs 10(1) and (2) of this subsection, that ongoing operation of the 11EGU is necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability 12or ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 13EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 14operations. All Up to and including the occurrence of an 15emission reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and 16large GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:17        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 18    participant in a regional transmission organization 19    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 20    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 21    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 22    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 23    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;24        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 25    participant in a regional transmission organization 26    receives notice that the regional transmission   HB5537- 10 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1    organization has determined that continued operation of 2    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 3    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 4    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 5    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 6    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 7    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 8    subsection (g), or (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 9    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 10    identified by the regional transmission organization is 11    resolved; and12        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 13    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 14    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 15    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 16    or (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 17    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 18    Illinois Commerce Commission.19    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 20relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 21emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 22Section.23    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 24shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 25forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 26units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for   HB5537- 11 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1the prior year.2    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 3Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 4Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 5publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 6State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 7development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 8emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 9developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 10current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 11reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 12years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 13Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 14Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 15Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 16Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 17regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 18anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 19development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 20unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 21The report shall be released publicly by no later than 22December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 23Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 24Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 25data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 26energy development, the pace of development of energy storage   HB5537- 12 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 2the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 3subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 4adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 5sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 6MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 7regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 8transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 9will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 10the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 11Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 12or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 13requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 14to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 15State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 16deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 17reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 18with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 19appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 20energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 21development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 22resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.23        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 24    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 25    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 26    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any   HB5537- 13 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 2    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 3    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 4    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 6    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 7    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 8    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 9    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 10    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 11    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 12    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 13    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 14    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 15    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 16    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 17    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 18    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 19    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 20    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 21    approval.22        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 23    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 24    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 25    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 26    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce   HB5537- 14 -LRB104 16312 BDA 29698 b1    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 2    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 3    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 4    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 6    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 7    mitigation plan within 180 days.8        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 9    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 10    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 11    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 12    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 13    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 14    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 15    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 16    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 17    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 18    increases in emissions.19        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 20    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 21    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 22    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 23    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 24    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 25(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.)